Nebraska, session 109, LB680.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB680 LB680
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1204 (1) The role and mission of the educational service units is
to serve as educational service providers in the state's system of
elementary and secondary education.
(2) Educational service units shall:
(a) Act primarily as service agencies in providing core services and
services identified and requested by member school districts;
(b) Provide for economy, efficiency, and cost-effectiveness in the
cooperative delivery of educational services;
(c) Provide educational services through leadership, research, and
development in elementary and secondary education;
(d) Act in a cooperative and supportive role with the State
Department of Education and school districts in development and
implementation of long-range plans, strategies, and goals for the
enhancement of educational opportunities in elementary and secondary
education; and
(e) Serve, when appropriate and as funds become available, as a
repository, clearinghouse, and administrator of federal, state, and
private funds on behalf of school districts which choose to participate
in special programs, projects, or grants in order to enhance the quality
of education in Nebraska schools.
(3) Core services shall be provided by educational service units to
all member school districts. Core services shall be defined by each
educational service unit as follows:
(a) Core services shall be within the following service areas in
order of priority: (i) Staff development which shall include access to
staff development related to improving the achievement of students in
poverty and students with diverse backgrounds; (ii) technology, including
distance education services; and (iii) instructional materials services;
(b) Core services shall improve teaching and student learning by
-2-

LB680 LB680
2025 2025
focusing on enhancing school improvement efforts, meeting statewide
requirements, and achieving statewide goals in the state's system of
elementary and secondary education;
(c) Core services shall provide schools with access to services
that:
(i) The educational service unit and its member school districts
have identified as necessary services;
(ii) Are difficult, if not impossible, for most individual school
districts to effectively and efficiently provide with their own personnel
and financial resources;
(iii) Can be efficiently provided by each educational service unit
to its member school districts; and
(iv) Can be adequately funded to ensure that the service is provided
equitably to the state's public school districts;
(d) Core services shall be designed so that the effectiveness and
efficiency of the service can be evaluated on a statewide basis; and
(e) Core services shall be provided by the educational service unit
in a manner that minimizes the costs of administration or service
delivery to member school districts.
(4) Educational service units shall meet minimum accreditation
standards set by the State Board of Education that will:
(a) Provide for accountability to taxpayers;
(b) Assure that educational service units are assisting and
cooperating with school districts to provide for equitable and adequate
educational opportunities statewide; and
(c) Assure a level of quality in educational programs and services
provided to school districts by the educational service units.
(5) Educational service units may contract to provide services to:
(a) Nonmember public school districts;
(b) Nonpublic school systems;
(c) Other educational service units; and
-3-

LB680 LB680
2025 2025
(d) Other public agencies, under the Interlocal Cooperation Act and
the Joint Public Agency Act.
(6) Educational service units shall not regulate school districts
unless specifically provided pursuant to another section of law.
(7) The board of any educational service unit in this state may pay
from its funds an amount to be determined by the board for membership
dues in associations of school boards or boards of education.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-